Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-2] Definitions. In this chapter:

"Covered voter"
means:

(1) A uniformed-service voter or an overseas voter
who is registered to vote in this State;

(2) An overseas voter who,
before leaving the United States, was last eligible to vote in this State and,
except for a state residency requirement, otherwise satisfies this State's
voter eligibility requirements;

(3) An overseas voter who,
before leaving the United States, would have been last eligible to vote in this
State had the voter then been of voting age and, except for a state residency
requirement, otherwise satisfies this State's voter eligibility requirements;
or

(4) An overseas voter who
was born outside the United States, is not described in paragraph (2) or (3),
and except for a state residency requirement, otherwise satisfies this State's
voter eligibility requirements, if:

(A) The last place where a parent or legal
guardian of the voter was, or under this chapter would have been, eligible to
vote before leaving the United States is within this State; and

(B) The voter has not previously registered to vote in any
other state.

"Dependent" means an individual
recognized as a dependent by a uniformed service.

"Federal
postcard application" means the application prescribed under section
101(b)(2) of the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C.
section 1973ff(b)(2).

"Federal
write-in absentee ballot" means the ballot described in section 103 of the
Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. section
1973ff-2.

"Military-overseas
ballot" means:

(1) A federal write-in absentee ballot;

(2) A ballot specifically prepared or distributed for
use by a covered voter in accordance with this chapter; or

(3) A ballot cast by a covered voter in accordance
with this chapter.

"Overseas voter" means a United
States citizen who is living outside the United States.

"State" means a state of the United
States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of
the United States.

"Uniformed service" means:

(1) Active and reserve
components of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard of the
United States;

(2) The Merchant Marine,
the commissioned corps of the Public Health Service, or the commissioned corps
of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration of the United States; or

(3) The National Guard and
state militia.

"Uniformed-service voter" means an
individual who is qualified to vote and is:

(1) A member of the active or reserve components of
the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard of the United States
who is on active duty;

(2) A member of the Merchant Marine, the commissioned
corps of the Public Health Service, or the commissioned corps of the National
Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration of the United States;

(3) A member on activated status of the National
Guard or state militia; or

(4) A spouse or dependent of a member referred to in
this definition.

"United States", used in the
territorial sense, means the several states, the District of Columbia, Puerto
Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, and any territory or insular possession
subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next